Idaho statutes. Title 42 IRRIGATION AND DRAINAGE — WATER RIGHTS AND RECLAMATION
Chapter 34 RATIFICATION OF INTERSTATE COMPACTS
ARTICLE VI

Existing storage rights in reservoirs constructed above Stewart Dam prior to February 4, 1955 are as follows:

In addition to the rights defined in paragraph A of this article, further storage entitlements above Stewart Dam are hereby granted. Wyoming and Utah are granted an additional right to store in any year 70,000 acre-feet of Bear River water for use in Utah and Wyoming to be divided equally; and Idaho is granted an additional right to store 4,500 acre-feet of Bear River water in Wyoming or Idaho for use in Idaho. Water rights granted under this paragraph and water appropriated, including ground water tributary to Bear River, which is applied to beneficial use on or after January 1, 1976, shall not result in an annual increase in depletion of the flow of the Bear River and its tributaries above Stewart Dam of more than 28,000 acre-feet in excess of the depletion as of January 1, 1976. Thirteen thousand (13,000) acre-feet of the additional depletion above Stewart Dam is allocated to each of Utah and Wyoming, and two thousand (2,000) acre-feet is allocated to Idaho.
The additional storage rights provided for in this paragraph shall be subordinate to, and shall not be exercised when the effect thereof will be to impair or interfere with (1) existing direct flow rights for consumptive use in any river division and (2) existing storage rights above Stewart Dam, but shall not be subordinate to any right to store water in Bear Lake or elsewhere below Stewart Dam; provided, however, there shall be no diversion of water to storage above Stewart Dam under this paragraph B when the water surface elevation of Bear Lake is below 5,911.00 feet, Utah Power & Light Company datum (the equivalent of elevation 5,913.75 feet based on the sea level datum of 1929 through the Pacific Northwest Supplementary Adjustment of 1947). Water depletions permitted under this paragraph B shall be calculated and administered by a commission-approved procedure.

In addition to the rights defined in article VI, paragraphs A and B, Idaho, Utah and Wyoming are granted the right to store and use water above Stewart Dam that otherwise would be bypassed or released from Bear Lake at times when all other direct flow and storage rights are satisfied. The availability of such water and the operation of reservoir space to store water above Bear Lake under this paragraph shall be determined by a commission-approved procedure. The storage provided for in this paragraph shall be subordinate to all other storage and direct flow rights in the Bear River. Storage rights under this paragraph shall be exercised with equal priority on the following basis: six (6) percent thereof to Idaho; forty-seven (47) percent thereof to Utah; and forty-seven (47) percent thereof to Wyoming.

The waters of Bear Lake below elevation 5,912.91 feet, Utah Power & Light Company Bear Lake datum (the equivalent of elevation 5,915.66 feet based on the sea level datum of 1929 through the Pacific Northwest Supplementary Adjustment of 1947) shall constitute a reserve for irrigation. The water of such reserve shall not be released solely for the generation of power, except in emergency, but after release for irrigation it may be used in generating power if not inconsistent with its use for irrigation. Any water in Bear Lake in excess of that constituting the irrigation reserve may be used solely for the generation of power or for other beneficial uses. As new reservoir capacity above the Stewart Dam is constructed to provide additional storage pursuant to paragraph A of this article, the commission shall make a finding in writing as to the quantity of additional storage and shall thereupon make an order increasing the irrigation reserve in accordance with the following table:

Subject to existing rights, each state shall have the use of water, including ground water, for ordinary domestic, and stock watering purposes, as determined by state law and shall have the right to impound water for such purposes in reservoirs having storage capacities not in excess, in any case, of 20 acre-feet, without deduction from the allocation made by paragraphs A, B, and C of this article.

The storage rights in Bear Lake are hereby recognized and confirmed subject only to the restrictions hereinbefore recited.

Idaho ............................... 324 acre-feet

Utah ............................... 11,850 acre-feet

Wyoming ............................... 2,150 acre-feet

Additional rights are hereby granted to store in any water year above Stewart Dam, 35,500 acre-feet of Bear River water and no more under this paragraph for use in Utah and Wyoming; and to store in any water year in Idaho or Wyoming on Thomas Fork 1,000 acre-feet of water for use in Idaho. Such additional storage rights shall be subordinate to, and shall not be exercised when the effect thereof will be to impair or interfere with (1) existing direct flow rights for consumptive use in any river division and (2) existing storage rights above Stewart Dam, but shall not be subordinate to any right to store water in Bear Lake or elsewhere below Stewart Dam. One half of the 35,500 acre-feet of additional storage right above Stewart Dam so granted to Utah and Wyoming is hereby allocated to Utah, and the remaining one half thereof is allocated to Wyoming.

Lake Surface elevation

Additional storage Utah Power & Light Company

acre-feet Bear Lake datum

5,000 5,913.24

10,000 5,913.56

15,000 5,913.87

20,000 5,914.15

25,000 5,914.41

30,000 5,914.61

35,500 5,914.69
36,500 5,914.70

ARTICLE VII

It is the policy of the signatory states to encourage additional projects for the development of the water resources of the Bear River to obtain the maximum beneficial use of water with a minimum of waste, and in furtherance of such policy, authority is granted within the limitations provided by this compact, to investigate, plan, construct, and operate such projects without regard to state boundaries, provided that water rights for each such project shall, except as provided in article VI, paragraphs A and B thereof, be subject to rights theretofore initiated and in good standing.

ARTICLE VIII

No state shall deny the right of the United States of America, and subject to the conditions hereinafter contained, no state shall deny the right of another signatory state, any person or entity of another signatory state, to acquire rights to the use of water or to construct or to participate in the construction and use of diversion works and storage reservoirs with appurtenant works, canals, and conduits in one state for use of water in another state, either directly or by exchange. Water rights acquired for out-of-state use shall be appropriated in the state where the point of diversion is located in the manner provided by law for appropriation of water for use within such state.

Any signatory state, any person or any entity of any signatory state, shall have the right to acquire in any other signatory state such property rights as are necessary to the use of water in conformity with this compact by donation, purchase, or, as hereinafter provided through the exercise of the power of eminent domain in accordance with the law of the state in which such property is located. Any signatory state, upon the written request of the governor of any other signatory state for the benefit of whose water users property is to be acquired in the state to which such written request is made, shall proceed expeditiously to acquire the desired property either by purchase at a price acceptable to the requesting governor, or if such purchase cannot be made, then through the exercise of its power of eminent domain and shall convey such property to the requesting state or to the person, or entity designated by its governor provided, that all costs of acquisition and expenses of every kind and nature whatsoever incurred in obtaining such property shall be paid by the requesting state or the person or entity designated by its governor.

Should any facility be constructed in a signatory state by and for the benefit of another signatory state or persons or entities therein, as above provided, the construction, repair, replacement, maintenance and operation of such facility shall be subject to the laws of the state in which the facility is located.

In the event lands or other taxable facilities are acquired by a signatory state in another signatory state for the use and benefit of the former, the users of the water made available by such facilities, as a condition precedent to the use thereof, shall pay to the political subdivisions of the state in which such facilities are located, each and every year during which such rights are enjoyed for such purposes, a sum of money equivalent to the average of the amount of taxes annually levied and assessed against the land and improvements thereon during the ten years preceding the acquisition of such land. Said payments shall be in full reimbursement for the loss of taxes in such political subdivision of the state.
E. Rights to the use of water acquired under this article shall in all respects be subject to this compact.

ARTICLE IX

Stored water, or water from another watershed may be turned into the channel of the Bear River in one state and a like quantity, with allowance for loss by evaporation, transpiration, and seepage, may be taken out of the Bear River in another state either above or below the point where the water is turned into the channel, but in making such exchange the replacement water shall not be inferior in quality for the purpose used or diminished in quantity. Exchanges shall not be permitted if the effect thereof is to impair vested rights or to cause damage for which no compensation is paid. Water from another watershed or source which enters the Bear River by actions within a state may be claimed exclusively by that state and use thereof by that state shall not be subject to the depletion limitations of articles IV, V and VI. Proof of any claimed increase in flow shall be the burden of the state making such claim, and it shall be approved only by the unanimous vote of the commission.

ARTICLE X

The following rights to the use of Bear River water carried in interstate canals are recognized and confirmed.

All interstate rights shall be administered by the state in which the point of diversion is located and during times of water emergency, such rights shall be filled from the allocations specified in article IV hereof for the section in which the point of diversion is located, with the exception that the diversion of water into the Hilliard East Fork Canal, Lannon Canal, Lone Mountain Ditch, and Hilliard West Side Canal shall be under the administration of Wyoming. During times of water emergency these canals and the Lone Mountain Ditch shall be supplied from the allocation specified in article IV for the Upper Wyoming Section Diversions.
ARTICLE XI

Applications for appropriation, for change of point of diversion, place and nature of use, and for exchange of Bear River water shall be considered and acted upon in accordance with the law of the state in which the point of diversion is located, but no such application shall be approved if the effect thereof will be to deprive any water user in another state of water to which he is entitled, nor shall any such application be approved if the effect thereof will be an increase in the depletion of the flow of the Bear River and its tributaries beyond the limits authorized in each state in articles IV, V and VI of this compact. The official of each state in charge of water administration shall, at intervals and in the format established by the commission, report on the status of use of the respective allocations.

Primary

Date of right

Lands irrigated

Name of Canal priority second-feet Acres State

Hilliard East Fork 1914 28.00 2,644 Wyoming

Chapman 8-13-86 16.46 1,155 Wyoming

8-13-86 98.46 6,892 Utah

4-12-12 .57 40 Wyoming

5-3-12 4.07 285 Utah

5-21-12 10.17 712 Utah

2-6-13 .79 55 Wyoming

8-28-05 134.00

Francis Lee 1879 2.20 154 Wyoming

1879 7.41 519 Utah

Under the right as herein confirmed not to exceed 134 second-feet may be carried across the Wyoming-Utah state line in the Chapman Canal at any time for filling the Neponset Reservoir, for irrigation of land in Utah and for other purposes. The storage right in Neponset Reservoir is for 6,900 acre-feet which is a component part of the irrigation right for the Utah lands listed above.

All other rights to the use of water carried in interstate canals and ditches, as adjudicated in the state in which the point of diversion is located, are recognized and confirmed.

ARTICLE XII

Nothing in this compact shall be construed to prevent the United States, a signatory state or political subdivision thereof, person, corporation, or association, from instituting or maintaining any action or proceeding, legal or equitable, for the protection of any right under state or federal law or under this compact.

ARTICLE XIII

Nothing contained in this compact shall be deemed

to affect the obligations of the United States of America to the Indian tribes;

to impair, extend or otherwise affect any right or power of the United States, its agencies or instrumentalities involved herein; nor the capacity of the United States to hold or acquire additional rights to the use of the water of the Bear River;

to subject any property or rights of the United States to the laws of the states which were not subject thereto prior to the date of this compact;

to submit any property of the United States to taxation by the states or any subdivision thereof, nor to obligate the United States to pay any state or subdivision thereof for loss of taxes.

ARTICLE XIV

At intervals not exceeding twenty years, the commission shall review the provisions hereof, and after notice and public hearing, may propose amendments to any such provision, provided, however, that the provisions contained herein shall remain in full force and effect until such proposed amendments have been ratified by the legislatures of the signatory states and consented to by congress.

ARTICLE XV

This compact may be terminated at any time by the unanimous agreement of the signatory states. In the event of such termination all rights established under it shall continue unimpaired.
ARTICLE XVI

Should a court of competent jurisdiction hold any part of this compact to be contrary to the constitution of any signatory state or to the Constitution of the United States, all other severable provisions of this compact shall continue in full force and effect.

ARTICLE XVII

This compact shall be in effect when it shall have been ratified by the legislature of each signatory state and consented to by the congress of the United States of America. Notice of ratification by the legislatures of the signatory states shall be given by the governor of each signatory state to the governor of each of the other signatory states and to the President of the United States of America, and the President is hereby requested to give notice to the governor of each of the signatory states of approval by the congress of the United States of America.

IN WITNESS WHEREOF, The commissioners and their advisors have executed this compact in five originals, one of which shall be deposited with the General Services Administration of the United States of America, one of which shall be forwarded to the governor of each of the signatory states, and one of which shall be made a part of the permanent records of the Bear River Commission.

Done at Salt Lake City, Utah, this 22nd day of December 1978.

For the State of Idaho:

/s/ Don W. Gilbert

/s/ Clifford J. Skinner

/s/ J. Daniel Roberts

For the state of Utah:

/s/ David F. Lawrence

/s/ S. Paul Holmgren

/s/ Simeon Weston

For the state of Wyoming:

/s/ John A. Teichert

/s/ George L. Christopulos

/s/ J. W. Myers

Approved: Attest:

/s/ Wallace N. Jibson /s/ Daniel F. Lawrence

Representative of the United Secretary of the Bear River

States of America Compact Commission

§ 42-3403. Columbia Interstate Compact ratified. [Repealed.]

§ 42-3404. Anadromous fish — Compact with Washington and Oregon — Regulatory powers of fish and game representatives of states.

Should congress by virtue of the authority vested in it under article 1, section 10, of the Constitution of the United States, providing for compacts and agreements between states, ratify the following as a definite compact and agreement between the states of Washington, Oregon and Idaho, then, and in that event, there shall exist between the states of Washington, Oregon and Idaho a compact and agreement, the purport of which shall be substantially as follows:

The compact states acknowledge that they have a common interest in the conservation and management of anadromous fish stocks in the Columbia River drainage and they mutually agree to assume joint responsibility in developing sports and commercial fishery programs and regulations which will maintain and preserve the resource for the interest and benefit of all users.

Membership from the compact states shall be the Idaho department of fish and game, the fish commission of the state of Oregon, Oregon wildlife commission, Washington department of fisheries and the Washington department of game or the successor agency to any of the above. The compact members may appoint advisors to serve as needed.

All rules and regulations now existing or which may be necessary for the conservation and management of anadromous fish in the waters of the main stem of the Columbia River from its mouth to the mouth of the Snake River and the waters of the main stem of the Snake River from its mouth to the mouth of the Salmon River, shall be made, changed, altered and amended in whole or in part by a majority vote. In voting on rules and regulations, each state shall be entitled to one (1) vote. Idaho will vote only on those regulations which might have a substantial impact on fish destined for Idaho waters.

The individual states shall be responsible for the management of anadromous fish stocks in pertinent tributary streams and shall be guided in such management by the intent and purpose of this compact.